Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB650.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The musical composition "A Mighty Long Way," composed by Shawn E. Okpebholo, is
named and designated as the official state musical composition.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/5/2026 8:49 AM Jacketed